North Dakota, session 69, HB1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION - SCIENCE
MUSEUM GRANT - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys in the
general fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum of $24,000,000, or so
much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of public instruction for the purpose of
providing a passthrough grant for a science museum construction project, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. The department of public instruction may
award the grant only upon certification from the prospective grant recipient that the prospective
grant recipient has raised at least $24,000,000 of matching funds from nonstate sources for the
project. This appropriation is considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 1 25.1251.01000